District of Columbia statutes.
7-1541.06

Exemptions from subchapter.

Nothing in this subchapter and §§ 43-119 and 43-125 shall be construed:

(1)

To prohibit funeral directors, licensed pursuant to §§ 3-405 and 3-406, from discharging their duties; or

(2)

To prohibit or affect in any way the authority, duties, rights, or obligations vested, imposed, or granted by Chapter 2 of Title 3.

History

Sept. 10, 1962, 76 Stat. 537, Pub. L. 87-656, § 12
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-192, § 23, 33 DCR 7836

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-1606.
1973 Ed., § 2-259.